Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9405
Notification of discharge or transfer.

If a patient or a patient’s legal guardian designates a caregiver, the hospital shall notify the caregiver of the patient’s discharge from the hospital or transfer to another facility as soon as practicable which may be after the patient’s physician issues a discharge or transfer order. If the hospital is unable to contact the caregiver, such lack of contact shall not interfere with, delay, or otherwise affect the medical care provided to the patient or the medically appropriate discharge or transfer of the patient. The hospital shall document all attempts to contact the caregiver in the patient's medical record.

Laws 2016, LB698, § 11.